District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.07

Sex discrimination in benefit programs.

No benefit program shall be denied to any District employee on account of sex.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 707, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-607.7.
1973 Ed., § 1-337.7.